Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.130

Proceeding not to fail for want of judge or session of court.

No proceeding in a court of justice in any action, suit, or proceeding pending therein, is affected by a vacancy in the office of any or all of the judges, or by the failure of a session of the court.

[ 1891 c 49 s 2; RRS s 67.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Section superseded by CR 6(c). See comment by court after CR 6(c).